Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 634.016 is amended to read:
634.016. (1) Every pesticide, including each formula or formulation,  manufactured, compounded,
delivered, distributed, sold, offered or exposed for sale in  this state shall be registered each year
with the State Department of Agriculture.
(2) Every device manufactured, delivered, distributed, sold, offered  or exposed for sale in this
state shall be registered each year with the department.
(3) The registration shall be made by the manufacturer or a distributor of the pesticide.
(4) The application for registration shall include:
(a) The name and address of the registrant.
(b) The name and address of the manufacturer if different than the registrant.
(c) The brand name or trademark of the pesticide.
(d) A specimen or facsimile of the label of  each pesticide, and each formula or formulation, for
which registration is sought, except for annual renewals of the registration when the label remains
unchanged.
(e) The correct name and total percentage of each active ingredient.
(f) The total percentage of inert ingredients.
(5) The application for registration shall be accompanied by a registration fee to  be established
by the department for each pesticide and each formula  or formulation. The registration fee may not
exceed [ $400] $550 for each such pesticide, or each formula or formulation.
(6) The department,  at the time of application for registration of any pesticide or after a decla-
ration of a ground water management area under ORS 468B.180 may:
(a) Restrict or limit the  manufacture, delivery, distribution, sale or use of any pesticide in this
state.
(b) Refuse to register any pesticide that is  highly toxic for which there is no effective antidote
under the conditions of use for which such pesticide is intended or recommended.
(c) Refuse to register any pesticide for use on  a crop for which no finite tolerances for residues
of such pesticide have been established by either the department or the federal government.
(d) In restricting the purposes for which pesticides may be  manufactured, delivered, distributed,
sold or used, or in refusing to register any pesticide, give consideration to:
Enrolled House Bill 2809 (HB 2809-INTRO) Page 1
(A) The damage to health or life of  humans or animals, or detriment to the environment, that
might result from the distribution and use of such pesticide.
(B) Authoritative findings and recommendations of agencies of the federal  government and of
any advisory committee or group established under ORS 634.306 (10).
(C) The existence of an effective antidote under  known conditions of use for which the material
is intended or recommended.
(D) Residual or delayed toxicity of the material.
(E) The extent  to which a pesticide or its carrying agent simulates by appearance and may be
mistaken for human food or animal feed.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not, except as provided herein, apply to:
(a) The use and purchase of pesticides by the federal government or its agencies.
(b) The sale or exchange of pesticides between manufacturers and distributors.
(c) Drugs, chemicals or other preparations sold or intended for medicinal or toilet purposes or
for use in the arts or sciences.
(d) Common carriers, contract carriers or public  warehousemen delivering or storing pesticides,
except as provided in ORS 634.322.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 634.016 by section 1 of  this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture may take any actions before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that are necessary to enable  the department, on
and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, to carry out the
amendments to ORS 634.016 by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2809 (HB 2809-INTRO) Page 2